Massachusetts, session 194th, S2154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting at the end thereof, the following new section:- 
Section 15 CCCCCC. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the 
second week of November as Massachusetts Drowsy Driving Prevention Week and 
recommending that such week be properly observed as a period of special attention to the need 
for public awareness and action relative to the problems of drowsy driving and driver fatigue. 
For purposes of this section “drowsy driving” or “driver fatigue” shall mean driving while being 
sleepy, tired, drowsy, or exhausted.